Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1528.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Grand-family Assistance Program Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.The intent of this act is to establish a grant system for PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES EMERGENCY, ONE-TIME FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO an individual who is a qualified grandparent, resides in this Commonwealth and serves as the primary caregiver for the individual's grandchild while the child's parent actively participates in an opioid use disorder treatment program. IT IS <--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516 ALSO THE INTENT OF THIS ACT TO SUPPORT INDIVIDUALS IN RECOVERY FROM OPIOID USE DISORDER AND ANY CO-OCCURRING SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER OR MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION BY PROVIDING COMPREHENSIVE WRAP-AROUND SERVICES TO THOSE INDIVIDUALS, INCLUDING CHILD CARE.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"APPLICATION." AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION 5 BY AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING SEEKING PAYMENTS UNDER THIS ACT ON BEHALF OF GRAND-FAMILIES."Area agency on aging." An agency designated by the department to administer and develop an area plan for a comprehensive and coordinated system of services for older people within the boundaries of a defined planning and service area."Department." The Department of Aging of the Commonwealth."Grand-family." A family where an individual is a grandparent acting as the primary caregiver for the individual's grandchild whose parents cannot provide care due to an opioid use disorder."ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SATISFIES ALL OF THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:(1) THE INDIVIDUAL IS 40 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND RESIDES WITH A CHILD WHO IS YOUNGER THAN 18 YEARS OF AGE.(2) THE INDIVIDUAL IS THE GRANDPARENT OR STEP-GRANDPARENT OF THE CHILD.(3) THE INDIVIDUAL IS THE PRIMARY CAREGIVER OF THE CHILD BECAUSE THE BIOLOGICAL OR ADOPTIVE PARENTS ARE UNABLE OR UNWILLING TO ACT AS THE PRIMARY CAREGIVER OF THE CHILD.20250HB1528PN2621 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS A LEGAL RELATIONSHIP TO THE CHILD, INCLUDING LEGAL CUSTODY, ADOPTION OR GUARDIANSHIP OF THE CHILD, OR IS CARING FOR THE CHILD IN AN INFORMAL MANNER."GRAND-FAMILY." THE HOUSEHOLD FORMED BY AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL AND THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL'S GRANDCHILD WHO RESIDES WITH THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL AND FOR WHOM THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL IS THE PRIMARY CAREGIVER."Opioid use disorder treatment program." A program FACILITY licensed and approved by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs to address an individual's problematic pattern of opioid use leading to clinically significant impairment or distress."Program." The Grand-family Assistance Program established under section 4 4(A).Section 4. Grand-family Assistance Program.The Grand-family Assistance Program is established in the department. The program shall provide one-time grants to area agencies on aging that must use the grant money to provide financial assistance to grand-families for the reimbursement of eligible expenses.Section 5. Grant applications.Grant application forms shall be developed by the department and distributed to all area agencies on aging. An area agency on aging shall assist persons in the area that intend to apply for a grant under this act in completing the applications and verify, in writing, on the grant application that the application complies with all the requirements of section 6. The area agency on aging shall then forward the application to the department for review and, if appropriate, approval.Section 6. Grant requirements.20250HB1528PN2621 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Eligibility.--From money appropriated to the department for the purpose of the program, the department shall approve grants to local area agencies on aging for grand-families that are eligible to receive financial assistance for the reimbursement of expenses directly related to the care of a grandchild whose parent is actively participating in an opioid use disorder treatment program. The grand-family may not be reimbursed for any expense that is otherwise reimbursed, including payments received from the parent or an agency of the Federal, State or county government.(b) Funding from Opioid Settlement Restricted Account.--(1) In addition to any money appropriated from another fund or account to the department for the purpose of the program, money appropriated from the Opioid Settlement Restricted Account for costs associated with opioid remediation may be used to make grants under this act.(2) The department shall ensure that the amounts allocated for the program comply with the restrictions on the use of the money in the Opioid Settlement Restricted Account.Section 7. Powers and duties of department.The powers and duties of the department shall be:(1) To accept grants from the Federal Government and any other individual, agency or government for use in the program.(2) To promulgate such rules, regulations and directives as it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.(3) To annually provide to the chair and minority chair of the Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Aging and Older Adult Services 20250HB1528PN2621 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Committee of the House of Representatives the following information:(i) a list of area agencies on aging that applied for a grant;(ii) a list of area agencies on aging that received a grant;(iii) the total funds allocated in the program for that year; and(iv) the total funds expended by the area agencies on aging for the program for that year.SECTION 4. GRAND-FAMILY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--THE GRAND-FAMILY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM IS ESTABLISHED IN THE DEPARTMENT. SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE PAYMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) TO AREA AGENCIES ON AGING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ACT, WHICH SHALL BE USED SOLELY TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO GRAND-FAMILIES FOR THE REIMBURSEMENT OF ELIGIBLE EXPENSES UNDER SECTION 7.(B) USE OF PROGRAM PAYMENTS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE PROGRAM PAYMENTS TO AREA AGENCIES ON AGING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ACT. AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING SHALL USE THE PAYMENT RECEIVED UNDER THE PROGRAM ONLY TO REIMBURSE GRAND-FAMILIES FOR ELIGIBLE EXPENSES UNDER SECTION 7.(C) MAXIMUM REIMBURSEMENT.--A GRAND-FAMILY MAY RECEIVE A ONE-TIME REIMBURSEMENT UNDER SECTION 7 OF UP TO $1,000 FOR THE FIRST CHILD AND UP TO $500 FOR EACH ADDITIONAL CHILD, NOT TO EXCEED A TOTAL REIMBURSEMENT OF $2,000.SECTION 5. APPLICATION.(A) PROCESS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AN APPLICATION PROCESS FOR AREA AGENCIES ON AGING TO SEEK PROGRAM PAYMENTS ON BEHALF OF GRAND-FAMILIES.20250HB1528PN2621 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) PUBLIC NOTICE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST APPLICATION INSTRUCTIONS AND MATERIALS ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.(C) SUBMISSION.--AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING MUST SUBMIT AN APPLICATION IN THE FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.SECTION 6. APPLICATION DETERMINATIONS.(A) DEPARTMENT DETERMINATION.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE OR DENY AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING'S APPLICATION NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION.(B) DENIAL AND SUPPLEMENTATION.--AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING MAY SUBMIT ADDITIONAL RELEVANT INFORMATION TO SUPPLEMENT AN APPLICATION DENIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) NO LATER THAN 15 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE DENIAL. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE OR DENY THE SUPPLEMENTED APPLICATION NO LATER THAN 45 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE SUPPLEMENTED APPLICATION.SECTION 7. CONDITIONS FOR REIMBURSEMENT.(A) ELIGIBILITY.--FROM PAYMENTS RECEIVED UNDER THE PROGRAM, AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING SHALL REIMBURSE GRAND-FAMILIES FOR EXPENSES DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE CARE OF A GRANDCHILD WHILE A PARENT OF THE GRANDCHILD IS ACTIVELY PARTICIPATING IN AN OPIOID USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAM. A GRAND-FAMILY MAY NOT RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FOR AN EXPENSE THAT IS OTHERWISE REIMBURSED, INCLUDING PAYMENTS FROM THE PARENT OR FROM A FEDERAL, COMMONWEALTH OR COUNTY AGENCY.(B) INELIGIBILITY.--A GRAND-FAMILY MAY NOT RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT UNDER THIS ACT IF THE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL:(1) HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF, OR HAS PLEADED GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE TO, A CRIMINAL OFFENSE INVOLVING ABUSE, NEGLECT, EXPLOITATION OR ABANDONMENT; OR(2) IS NAMED AS THE PERPETRATOR IN A FOUNDED OR 20250HB1528PN2621 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INDICATED REPORT OF CHILD ABUSE UNDER 23 PA.C.S. CH. 63 (RELATING TO CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES).(C) INCOME LIMITATION.--AT THE TIME AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL APPLIES FOR REIMBURSEMENT UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE GRAND-FAMILY'S ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME MAY NOT EXCEED 250% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY INCOME GUIDELINES FOR THE APPLICABLE HOUSEHOLD SIZE, AS PUBLISHED ANNUALLY BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.(D) AGENCY REQUIREMENTS.--AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING THAT RECEIVES A PAYMENT UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL, UPON REQUEST, PROVIDE DOCUMENTS, RECORDS AND OTHER INFORMATION RELATED TO THE PAYMENT IN THE TIME, MANNER AND FORMAT REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR BY A FEDERAL OR COMMONWEALTH AGENCY WITH AUTHORITY TO AUDIT THE AREA AGENCY ON AGING OR THE PAYMENTS.(E) RECORDS AND RECOVERY.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY:(1) MONITOR, INSPECT OR AUDIT THE FINANCIAL, OPERATING AND ACCOUNTING RECORDS OF AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING THAT RECEIVES A PAYMENT UNDER THE PROGRAM AS THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS NECESSARY; OR(2) WITHHOLD, REDUCE OR RECOVER MONEY DISTRIBUTED TO AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING UNDER THE PROGRAM IF THE AREA AGENCY ON AGING DOES NOT COMPLY WITH THIS ACT OR APPLICABLE FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.SECTION 8. DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT.(A) GUIDELINES.--SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS, SHALL DEVELOP GUIDELINES FOR THE PROGRAM.(B) REPORTING.--NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 30, 2027, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 30 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A REPORT ON THE PROGRAM TO THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE AGING AND 20250HB1528PN2621 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 YOUTH COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE AGING AND OLDER ADULT SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST THE REPORT ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. THE REPORT SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR:(1) THE NUMBER OF PAYMENTS MADE TO AREA AGENCIES ON AGING.(2) THE AMOUNT OF MONEY RECEIVED BY EACH AREA AGENCY ON AGING.(3) THE COUNTY OF OPERATION FOR EACH AREA AGENCY ON AGING THAT RECEIVED FUNDING.(4) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS RECEIVED.(5) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS NECESSARY.(C) REGULATIONS.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROMULGATE REGULATIONS AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS ACT.SECTION 9. PROGRAM FUNDING.(A) ESTABLISHMENT OF FUND.--THE GRAND-FAMILY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FUND IS ESTABLISHED IN THE STATE TREASURY TO IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM.(B) APPROPRIATION.--MONEY IN THE FUND, INCLUDING INTEREST AND OTHER EARNINGS, IS APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT ON A CONTINUING BASIS FOR PAYMENTS UNDER THE PROGRAM. MONEY IN THE FUND SHALL NOT LAPSE AT THE END OF ANY FISCAL YEAR.(C) SOURCES.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY SOLICIT AND ACCEPT MONEY FOR THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING APPROPRIATIONS BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, FEDERAL MONEY, GRANTS, DONATIONS, GIFTS AND OTHER PAYMENTS FROM ANY SOURCE. ALL MONEY RECEIVED SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND.20250HB1528PN2621 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) OPIOID SETTLEMENT RESTRICTED ACCOUNT.--(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT FROM THE OPIOID SETTLEMENT RESTRICTED ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1792-A.1(A) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE, MAY BE USED TO MAKE PAYMENTS UNDER THE PROGRAM.(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT MONEY USED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) COMPLIES WITH THE RESTRICTIONS GOVERNING THE USE OF MONEY IN THE OPIOID SETTLEMENT RESTRICTED ACCOUNT.(E) COUNTY PARTICIPATION.--NOTHING IN THIS ACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A COUNTY TO USE THE COUNTY'S OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUNDS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.Section 8 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 90 days.20250HB1528PN2621 - 9 - <--<--1234567891011121314